Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1362
Agency affirmative action individual; appointed.

The head of each agency with more than ten employees shall appoint at least one individual as agency affirmative action individual for the agency to coordinate equal employment and affirmative action efforts with the office.

Laws 1979, LB 500, § 8.